Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-901
Act, how cited.

Sections 73-901 to 73-908 shall be known and may be cited as the Foreign Adversary Contracting Prohibition Act.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB644, § 26.